Oklahoma, session 2025, SB519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-725.11 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Collection action” means any of the following actions taken


with respect to a debt for items and services that were purchased


from, or provided to a patient by, a hospital on a date during which


the hospital was not in material compliance with hospital price


transparency laws:


a. attempting to collect a debt from a patient or patient


guarantor by referring the debt, directly or


indirectly, to a debt collector, collection agency, or

Req. No. 1071 Page 1


other third party retained by or on behalf of the


hospital,


b. suing the patient or patient guarantor or enforcing an


arbitration or mediation clause in any hospital


documents, including contracts, agreements,


statements, or bills, or


c. directly or indirectly causing a report to be made to


a consumer reporting agency;


2. a. “Collection agency” means any:


(1) person who engages in a business, the principal


purpose of which is the collection of debts, or


(2) person who:


(a) regularly collects or attempts to collect,


directly or indirectly, debts owed or due or


asserted to be owed or due to another,


(b) takes assignment of debts for collection


purposes, or


(c) directly or indirectly solicits for


collection debts owed or due or asserted to


be owed or due to another.


b. Collection agency does not include:


(1) any officer or employee of a creditor while, in


the name of the creditor, collecting debts for


such creditor,

Req. No. 1071 Page 2


(2) any person while acting as a collection agency


for another person, both of whom are related by


common ownership or affiliated by corporate


control, if the person acting as a collection


agency does so only for creditors to whom it is


so related or affiliated and if the principal


business of the person is not the collection of


debts,


(3) any officer or employee of the United States or


any state to the extent that collecting or


attempting to collect any debt is in the


performance of the officer’s or employee’s


official duties,


(4) any person while serving or attempting to serve


legal process on any other person in connection


with the judicial enforcement of any debt,


(5) any person collecting or attempting to collect


any debt owed or due or asserted to be owed or


due to another to the extent that:


(a) the activity is incidental to a bona fide


fiduciary obligation or a bona fide escrow


arrangement,


(b) the activity concerns a debt that was


extended by the person,

Req. No. 1071 Page 3


(c) the activity concerns a debt that was not in


default at the time it was obtained by the


person, or


(d) the activity concerns a debt obtained by the


person as a secured party in a commercial


credit transaction involving the creditor,


or


(6) any person whose principal business is the making


of loans or the servicing of debt not in default


and who acts as a loan correspondent, seller and


servicer for the owner, or holder of a debt that


is secured by a deed of trust on real property,


whether or not the debt is also secured by an


interest in personal property.


c. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph b of


this paragraph, collection agency includes any person


who, in the process of collecting the person’s own


debts, uses another name that would indicate that a


third person is collecting or attempting to collect


such debts;


3. a. “Debt” means any obligation or alleged obligation of a


consumer to pay money arising out of a transaction,


whether or not the obligation has been reduced to


judgment.

Req. No. 1071 Page 4


b. Debt does not include a debt for business, investment,


commercial, or agricultural purposes or a debt


incurred by a business;


4. “Debt collector” means any person employed or engaged by a


collection agency to perform the collection of debts owed or due or


asserted to be owed or due to another;


5. “Hospital” means, consistent with 45 C.F.R., Section 180.20,


a hospital licensed by the State Department of Health under Section


1-702 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


6. “Items and services” or “items or services” means items and


services as defined in 45 C.F.R., Section 180.20.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-725.12 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. On and after the effective date of this act, no debt


collector shall initiate or pursue a collection action against the


patient or patient guarantor for a debt owed for the items or


services purchased from, or provided to a patient by, the hospital


to a collection agency.


B. Nothing in this act:


1. Prohibits a hospital from billing a patient, patient


guarantor, or third-party payer, including a health insurer, for


items or services provided to the patient; or



Req. No. 1071 Page 5


2. Requires a hospital to refund any payment made to the


hospital for items or services provided to the patient, so long as


no collection action is taken in violation of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1071 CAD 1/19/2025 5:37:55 AM





































Req. No. 1071 Page 6